Georgia, session 2025_26, HB676.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 3 of Article 8 of Chapter 14 of Title 44 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to mechanics and materialmen relative to liens, is amended by adding a new Code
section to read as follows:
"44-14-361.6.
Any lien filed pursuant to Code Section 44-14-361 that is made without substantial
justification or that is not made in good faith or that is made with malice or a wrongful
purpose, as such terms are defined in Code Section 51-7-80, shall be subject to a fine of
$1,500.00 per lien filed, in addition to any attorney's fees or court costs."
H. B. 676
- 1 -

LC 48 1510
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 676
- 2 -